Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

7-64-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2249, § 149, effective July 1, 2004.)

"Business" includes every trade, occupation, and profession.

"Debtor in bankruptcy" means a person who is the subject of:

An order for relief under Title 11 of the United States Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application; or

A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2249, § 149, effective July 1, 2004.)

"Distribution" means a transfer of money or other property from a partnership to a partner in the partner's capacity as a partner or to a transferee of all or a part of a partner's transferable interest.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2249, § 149, effective July 1, 2004.)

"Filed statement" means a statement that has been filed by the secretary of state pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title. A copy of a filed statement means a copy of the filed statement that the secretary of state has certified to be in the records of the secretary of state.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2249, § 149, effective July 1, 2004.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2249, § 149, effective July 1, 2004.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2249, § 149, effective July 1, 2004.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1448, § 154, effective July 1, 2004.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2249, § 149, effective July 1, 2004.)

"Limited liability partnership" means a partnership that is registered as a limited liability partnership under section 7-64-1002 (1).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1448, § 154, effective July 1, 2004.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2249, § 149, effective July 1, 2004.)

"Partner" means a person who is admitted to a partnership as a partner of the partnership.

"Partnership" shall have the meaning set forth in section 7-64-202 (1).

"Partnership agreement" means the agreement, whether written, oral, or implied, among the partners that governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership. For purposes of part 10 of this article, the term "partnership agreement" shall have the meaning set forth in section 7-64-1001 (2).

"Partnership at will" means a partnership that is not a partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking.

"Partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking" means a partnership in which the partners have agreed to remain partners until the expiration of a definite term or the completion of a particular undertaking.

"Partnership interest" or "partner's interest in the partnership" means all of a partner's interests in the partnership, including the partner's transferable interest and all management and other rights.

"Partnership obligation" means any debt, obligation, or liability of the partnership, whether sounding in tort, contract, or otherwise.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2249, § 149, effective July 1, 2004.)

"Property" means all property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein.

"Registrant" means a person that is registered under section 7-64-1002.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2249, § 149, effective July 1, 2004.)

"Statement" means a statement of partnership authority under section 7-64-303, a statement of denial under section 7-64-304, a statement of dissociation under section 7-64-704, a statement of dissolution under section 7-64-805, a statement of registration under section 7-64-1002, a statement of withdrawal of registration under section 7-64-1002, a statement of correction under section 7-90-305, or a statement of change under section 7-90-305.5 of any of the foregoing.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2249, § 149, effective July 1, 2004.)

"Transfer" includes an assignment, conveyance, lease, mortgage, deed, and encumbrance.

"Transferable interest" means a partner's share of the profits and losses of the partnership and the partner's right to receive distributions.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 866, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2002:

(6), (7), and (29) amended, p. 1825, § 52, effective July 1; (6), (7), and (29) amended, p. 1690, § 50, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1), (4), (6), (8), (9), (10), (12), (15) to (20), (25), (28), (29), and (30) amended, p. 2249, § 149, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(11), (14), (15), (18), and (20) amended, p. 1448, § 154, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(18) amended, (HB 09-1248), ch. 252, p. 1130, § 7, effective May 14.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

7-64-102. Knowledge and notice.

A person knows or has knowledge of a fact if the person has conscious awareness of the fact.

A person has notice of a fact:

If the person knows of the fact;

If the person has received a notification of the fact;

If the person has reason to know the fact exists from all of the facts known to the person at the time in question; or

By reason of a filing or recording to the extent provided by and subject to limitations set forth in section 7-64-303 (4) and (5), 7-64-704 (3), or 7-64-805 (3).

A person notifies or gives a notification to another by taking steps reasonably appropriate to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not the other person thereby obtains knowledge of the fact.

A person receives a notification when the notification:

Comes to the person's attention; or

Is received at the person's place of business or at any other place held out by the person as a place for receiving communications, or is received by a person who is apparently authorized to receive the notification; or

Has been given and the circumstances are such that it is fair and reasonable, as against the person to whom such notice has been given, to treat the notice as having been received.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, a person other than an individual knows, has notice, or receives a notification of a fact for purposes of a particular transaction when an individual conducting the transaction on that person's behalf knows, has notice, or receives a notification of the fact, or in any event when the fact would have been brought to such an individual's attention if the person had exercised reasonable diligence. The person exercises reasonable diligence if the person maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to an individual conducting the transaction on the person's behalf and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Reasonable diligence does not require an individual acting for the person to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual's regular duties or the individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the information.

A partner's knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact relating to the partnership is effective immediately as knowledge by, notice to, or receipt of a notification by the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of that partner.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 869, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-103. Effect of partnership agreement - nonwaivable provisions - statute of frauds.

To the extent the partnership agreement does not otherwise provide, this article governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

The partnership agreement may not:

Vary the rights and duties under section 7-64-105, except to eliminate the duty to provide copies of statements to all of the partners;

Unreasonably restrict the right of access to books and records under section 7-64-403 (2) or unreasonably limit the obligations of the partners or the partnership under section 7-64-403 (3);

Eliminate any of the duties specified in section 7-64-404 (1)(a), (1)(b), or (1)(c) or in section 7-64-603 (2)(c); except that:

The partnership agreement may identify types or categories of activities that do not violate any of the duties specified in section 7-64-404 (1)(a), (1)(b), or (1)(c), if not manifestly unreasonable; or

All of the partners or a number or percentage stated in the partnership agreement may authorize or ratify, after full disclosure of all material facts, an act or transaction that otherwise would violate any of the duties stated in section 7-64-404 (1)(a), (1)(b), or (1)(c);

Unreasonably reduce the duty of care under section 7-64-404 (3) or 7-64-603 (2)(c);

Eliminate the obligation of good faith and fair dealing under section 7-64-404 (3), but the partnership agreement may prescribe the standards by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured, if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable;

Vary the power to dissociate as a partner under section 7-64-602 (1), except to require the notice under section 7-64-601 (1)(a) to be in writing;

Vary the right of a court to expel a partner in the events specified in section 7-64-601 (1)(e);

Vary the requirement to wind up the partnership business in cases specified in section 7-64-801 (1)(d), (1)(e), or (1)(f);

Restrict rights of third persons under this article; or

Vary the law applicable to limited liability partnerships as set forth in section 7-64-106 (3).

A partnership agreement is not subject to any statute of frauds, including section 38-10-112, C.R.S., regarding void agreements, but not including any requirement under this article that a particular action or provision be reflected in a writing.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 870, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2)(c)(II) amended, p. 2251, § 150, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

IP(2)(c) and (2)(c)(II) amended, p. 1449, § 155, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(3) added, (HB 16-1333), ch. 241, p. 986, § 2, effective August 10.

7-64-104. Supplemental principles of law.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this article, the principles of law and equity supplement this article.

If an obligation to pay interest arises under this article and the rate is not specified, the rate is that specified in section 5-12-102, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 871, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-105. Filing and recording of statements.

A statement may be delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title. A certified copy of a statement that is filed in an office in another jurisdiction may be delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title. Either filing in this state has the effect provided in this article with respect to partnership property located in or transactions that occur in this state.

Only a copy of a filed statement recorded in the office for recording transfers of real property has the effect provided for recorded statements in this article.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2251, § 151, effective July 1, 2004.)

A person who delivers or causes a statement to be delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to this section shall promptly deliver a copy of the statement to every nonfiling partner and to any other person named as a partner in the statement. Failure to deliver a copy of a statement to a partner or other person does not limit the effectiveness of the statement as to a person not a partner.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 871, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2002:

(4) amended, p. 1826, § 53, effective July 1; (4) amended, p. 1690, § 51, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1), (3), (4), and (5) amended, p. 2251, § 151, effective July 1, 2004.

7-64-106. Law governing internal relations.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the law of the jurisdiction under which a partnership is formed governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

A partnership is presumed to have been formed in the jurisdiction in which it has its chief executive office.

The law of this state shall govern relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership, and the liability of partners for partnership obligations, in a partnership that has filed a statement of registration as a limited liability partnership in this state.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 872, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 2252, § 152, effective July 1, 2004.

7-64-107. Partnership subject to amendment or repeal of article.

A partnership governed by this article is subject to any amendment to or repeal of this article.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 872, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.